Idaho, session 2026, S1233.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 16, Title 1, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 1-1626, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
1-1626. CONSTITUTIONAL COURTS ACT. No state court at any level of ju-
risdiction or authority shall enforce, consider, or apply any judgment, de-
cree, ruling, or decision of arbitration based on a body of religious or cul-
tural law that does not fully support and conform with the rights of citi-
zens as defined in the United States constitution and the constitution of the
state of Idaho.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.